Georgia, session 2025_26, HB637.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
An Act to amend an Act creating the board of commissioners for Cobb County, Georgia,
approved April 4, 1991 (Ga. L. 1991, p. 4492), as amended, is amended by revising
Section 11A as follows:
"Section 11A.
Before the commission expends county funds of $200,000.00 or more to employ an
independent consultant or consulting firm or to conduct an independent study or survey,
it shall hold a public hearing thereon. At least 15 days' notice of the time and place of the
hearing shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation in the county. Consultants
H. B. 637
- 1 -

LC 44 3064/AP
to be used in support of construction or renovation projects shall be exempt from this
section."
SECTION 2.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 637
- 2 -